District of Columbia statutes.
20-734

Duty to account; unsupervised administration.

An unsupervised personal representative shall account to interested persons for his receipts, disbursements, and distribution of estate assets at reasonable intervals, or on reasonable demand, and may be compelled to account to the Court in a proceeding initiated by an interested person, following notice and hearing.

History

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(ww), 42 DCR 63

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-733.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-734.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.